Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-423
Mental health substance use treatment center, defined.

Mental health substance use treatment center means a facility where shelter, food, and counseling, supervision, diagnosis, treatment, care, rehabilitation, assessment, or related services professionally directed are provided for a period of more than twenty-four consecutive hours to persons residing at such facility who have a mental illness or substance use disorder or both, with the intention of reducing or ameliorating the disorder or disorders or the effects of the disorder or disorders.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 23;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 53.